Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2149
Project valuation; how treated.

In each year after the determination of a redevelopment project valuation as outlined in section 18-2148, the county assessor and the county board of equalization shall include no more than the redevelopment project valuation of the taxable real property in the redevelopment project in the assessed valuation upon which is computed the tax rates levied by any public body on such project. In each year for which the current assessed valuation on taxable real property in the redevelopment project exceeds the redevelopment project valuation, the county treasurer shall remit to the authority, instead of to any public body, that proportion of all ad valorem taxes on real property paid that year on the redevelopment project which such excess valuation bears to the current assessed valuation.

If the current assessed valuation on taxable real property in the redevelopment project is less than the redevelopment project valuation, the current assessed valuation shall be the value assessable to the public bodies for the current year and there will be no excess valuation or tax proceeds available to the redevelopment project. The redevelopment project valuation shall be reinstated when the current assessed valuation on taxable real property in the redevelopment project is equal to or greater than the redevelopment project valuation.

Laws 1979, LB 158, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 4.